Washington statutes.
RCW 11.125.290

Agent authority—Stocks, bonds, and financial instruments.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments authorizes the agent to:

(1) Buy, sell, and exchange stocks, bonds, and financial instruments;

(2) Establish, continue, modify, or terminate an account with respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments;

(3) Pledge stocks, bonds, and financial instruments as security to borrow, pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal;

(4) Receive certificates and other evidences of ownership with respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments;

(5) Exercise voting rights with respect to stocks, bonds, and financial instruments in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts, and consent to limitations on the right to vote;

(6) Buy, sell, exchange, assign, settle, and exercise commodity futures contracts and call or put options on stocks or stock indexes traded on a regulated option exchange; and

(7) Establish, continue, modify, and terminate option accounts.

[ 2016 c 209 s 206.]